District of Columbia statutes.
8-1031.07

Office of Waste Diversion.

There is established an Office of Waste Diversion (“Office”) within the Department of Public Works. The duties of the Office shall include:

(1)

Coordinating and supervising the implementation of the provisions of this chapter;

(2)

Implementing the source separation education and outreach program developed pursuant to § 8-1031.08;

(3)

Supervising and developing a system to respond to citizen inquiries about mandatory source separation;

(4)

Serving as a liaison between the District and neighboring jurisdictions in developing regional waste reduction and diversion campaigns;

(5)

Implementing policies developed by the Interagency Waste Reduction Working Group for reducing the generation of solid waste in the District and increasing the District’s solid waste diversion rate;

(6)

Publishing annually on its website the reports issued to the Council pursuant to § 8-1031.13; and

(7)

Registering all collectors and vehicles engaged in the collection or transportation of solid waste in accordance with § 8-1031.06.

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 107, 61 DCR 9971

History